Tennessee, session 114, SB0712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2406, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2407, is amended by deleting
"49-6-2406" in subsections (a) and (e) and substituting "49-6-2405".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0712
000158
- 1 -